North Carolina statutes. Chapter 157. Housing Authorities and Projects.
Article 2. Municipal Cooperation and Aid.

§ 157-40.
Finding and declaration of necessity.

It is hereby declared that insanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in various areas of the State, and that consequently many persons of low income are forced to reside in such dwelling accommodations; that these conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals and welfare of the citizens of the State and impair economic values; that the clearance, replanning and reconstruction of the areas in which insanitary or unsafe housing conditions exist and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income are public uses and purposes for which private property may be acquired; that it is in the public interest that work on such projects be instituted as soon as possible in order to relieve unemployment which now constitutes an emergency; and the necessity in the public interest for the provisions hereinafter enacted, is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For analysis of this Article, see 13 N.C.L. Rev. 379 (1935).

§ 157-41.
Definitions.

The following terms, whenever used or referred to in this Article, shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“City” shall mean any city or town of the State having a population of more than 500 inhabitants according to the last federal census or any revision or amendment thereto.

“Housing authority” shall mean any housing authority organized pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law of this State.

“Housing project” shall mean any undertaking (i) to demolish, clear, remove, alter or repair unsafe or insanitary housing, and/or (ii) to provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, and said term may also include such buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies for educational, health or welfare purposes, and such necessary utilities as are designed primarily for the benefit and use of the housing authority and/or the occupants of such dwelling accommodations.

“Municipality” shall mean any city, town or incorporated village of the State.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 2; 1961, c. 200, s. 4.

§ 157-42.
Conveyance, lease or agreement in aid of housing project.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, construction and operation of housing projects located within their respective territorial boundaries, the State, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county, city or municipality of the State may, upon such terms, with or without considerations as it may determine:

Dedicate, release, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses or any other rights or privileges therein to a housing authority or the United States of America or any agency thereof;

Cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works, which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with housing projects;

Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks or other places, which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

Plan or replan, zone, or rezone; make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances; any city or town also may change its map;

Cause services to be furnished to the housing authority of the character which it is otherwise empowered to furnish;

Enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by it of its powers relating to the repair, closing or demolition of unsafe, insanitary or unfit dwellings;

Enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with a housing authority respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this Article. Any law or statute to the contrary notwithstanding, any sale, conveyance, lease or agreement provided for in this section may be made by the State, a city, county, municipality, subdivision or agency of the State without appraisal, public notice, advertisement or public bidding.

With respect to any housing project which a housing authority has acquired or taken over from the United States of America or any agency thereof and which the housing authority by resolution has found and declared to have been constructed in a manner that will promote the public interest and afford necessary safety, sanitation and other protection, no city or county shall require any changes to be made in the housing project or the manner of its construction or take any other action relating to such construction.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 3; 1939, c. 137.

Cross References.

As to authority of municipalities regarding repair, closing and demolition of unfit dwellings, see G.S. 160A-441 et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the public purpose doctrine, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 37 (1967).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

See opinion of Attorney General to Dale Shepherd, 42 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 135 (1972).

§ 157-43.
Advances and donations by the city and municipality.

The council or other governing body of the city included within the territorial boundaries of such authority is authorized to make an estimate of the amount of money necessary for the administrative expenses and overhead of the housing authority during the first year following the incorporation of such housing authority, and to appropriate such amount to the authority out of any moneys in the city treasury not appropriated to some other purposes, and to cause the moneys so appropriated to be paid the authority as a donation, and moneys so appropriated and paid to a housing authority by a city shall be deemed to be a necessary expense of such city. In addition thereto, the city and any municipality located in whole or in part within the boundaries of a housing authority shall have the power annually and from time to time to make donations or advances to the authority of such sums as the city or municipality in its discretion may determine. The authority, when it has money available therefor, shall reimburse the city or municipality for all advances by way of loan made to it.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the public purpose doctrine, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 37 (1967).

§ 157-44.
Action of city or municipality by resolution.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article or by the Constitution of the State, all action authorized to be taken under this Article by the council or other governing body of any city or of any municipality may be by resolution adopted by a majority of all the members of its council or other governing body, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting of the council or other governing body at which such resolution is introduced and shall take effect immediately upon such adoption, and no such resolution need be published or posted.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 5.

§ 157-45.
Restrictions on exercise of right of eminent domain; duties of Utilities Commission; investigation of projects.

Notwithstanding any finding of public convenience and necessity, either in general or specific, by the terms of this Article, the right of eminent domain shall not be exercised unless and until a certificate of public convenience and necessity for such project has been issued by the Utilities Commission of North Carolina, and the proceedings leading up to the issuing of such certificate of public convenience and necessity, and the right to appeal therefrom shall be as now provided by law and said rights are hereby expressly reserved to all interested parties in said proceedings. In addition to the powers now granted by law to the Utilities Commission of North Carolina, the said Utilities Commission is hereby vested with full power and authority to investigate and examine all projects set up or attempted to be set up under the provisions of this Article and determine the question of public convenience and necessity for said project.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to proceedings before the Utilities Commission and appeal therefrom, see

G.S. 62-60

to 62-82.

§ 157-46.
Purpose of Article.

It is the purpose and intent of this Article that the State, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county, city or municipality of the State shall be authorized, and are hereby authorized, to do any and all things necessary to aid and cooperate in the planning, construction and operation of housing projects by the United States of America and by housing authorities.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 7.

§ 157-47.
Supplemental nature of Article.

The powers conferred by this Article shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

History.

1935, c. 408, s. 8.